Massachusetts, session 194th, S1735.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 2DDDDDD following new section:-  
Section 2EEEEEE. There shall be established and set up on the books of the 
Commonwealth a PFAS Public Safety Fund. For the purposes of this section, the term “PFAS” 
shall include Perfluoroalkyl and Polyfluoroalkyl substances. The secretary of public safety and 
security shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of amounts credited to the fund from: 
(i) any appropriations, grants, settlements, gifts or other money authorized by the general court 
or other parties and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; and (ii) any income derived 
from the investment of amounts credited to the fund. Any unexpended balance in the fund at the 

of 2 10 end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in 
the subsequent fiscal year. Amounts credited to the fund may be expended, without further 
appropriation, by the secretary on related programs, grants and costs. Such fund shall be used to 
support the development, testing and purchasing of a PFAS-free Firefighter Turnout Gear 
moisture barrier material and design that meet or exceed current NFPA standards without 
compromising protection or performance and the development and testing of other new materials 
and designs for turnout gear that reduce the inherent dangers firefighters face, including but not 
limited to, enhanced protection against primary and secondary exposure to particulates and 
byproducts of combustion and reduced maintenance that includes contamination resistance and 
greater ease of cleaning for any new technical fabrics or designs. Such fund shall also be used for 
programs, grants and costs for the disposal of turnout gear which contains PFAS.